Utah statutes.
63H-2-203.   Powers of the board and authority -- Officers.

(1) (a)  The authority is governed by the board.

(b)  Only the board may exercise a power of the authority.

(2)  Subject to the other provisions of this chapter, the board shall:

(a)  manage and conduct the activities of the authority; and

(b)  determine the policies of the authority.

(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board may make rules necessary to implement this chapter.

(4)  The board may:

(a)  appoint one or more officers and employees required for the performance of the board's duties under this chapter; and

(b)  fix and determine the qualifications and duties of an officer or employee described in Subsection (4)(a).

